Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 15 Attorney General

Cross references.

Qualifications for Attorney General, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. III, Para. II.

Duties of Attorney General, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. III, Para IV.

Vacating of office upon permanent physical or mental disability of holder of office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. IV.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Vacancies Act and an Acting Attorney General,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 699 (2020).